Nebraska statutes.
Section 1.Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska71-5803.09
Intermediate care facility, intermediate care facility for the mentally retarded, defined.

Intermediate care facility has the same meaning as in section 71-420 and includes an intermediate care facility for the mentally retarded that has sixteen or more beds. Intermediate care facility for the mentally retarded has the same meaning as in section 71-421.

Laws 1979, LB 172, § 19;

Laws 1988, LB 1100, § 174;

R.S.1943, (1996), § 71-5819;

Laws 1997, LB 798, § 13;

Laws 2000, LB 819, § 116;

Laws 2009, LB511, § 1.